Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

In General

16-1-101. Vesting of judicial power.

The judicial power of the state is vested in judges of the courts of general sessions, recorders of certain towns and cities, circuit courts, criminal courts, common law and chancery courts, chancery courts, courts of appeals, and the supreme court, and other courts created by law.

Code 1858, §§ 4094, 4095 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 1); Shan., § 5907; mod. Code 1932, § 10107; modified; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-101.

Cross-References. Constitutional vesting of power, power of general assembly to create courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Drug Treatment Courts and Emergent Experimentalist Government, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 831 (2000).

Inferiority Complex: Should State Courts Follow Lower Federal Court Precedent on the Meaning of Federal Law?, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 53 (2015).

Justiciability in Tennessee, Part Three: Timing (Barbara Kritchevsky), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 177 (1986).

Original Meaning and the Precedent Fallback, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 105 (2015).

Attorney General Opinions. General authority of judges of general sessions to administer oaths is not limited by T.C.A. §§ 8-18-107, 8-18-109(b) or 17-1-105, OAG 03-043, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (4/15/03).

16-1-102. Powers of court.

Every court has the power to:

Enforce order in its immediate presence, or as near thereto as is necessary to prevent interruption, disturbance, or hindrance to its proceedings;

Enforce order before a person or body acting under its authority;

Compel obedience to its judgments, orders, and process, and to the order of a judge out of court, in an action or proceeding in court;

Control, in furtherance of justice, the conduct of its officers, and all other persons connected with a judicial proceeding before it, in every matter pertaining to the proceeding;

Administer oaths whenever it may be necessary in the exercise of its powers and duties; and

Control its process and orders.

Code 1858, § 4099; Shan., § 5911; mod. Code 1932, § 10110; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-102.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 306.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.14.

Law Reviews.

Clashes with Judges Can't Always be Attributed to “Robitis” (Hon. R. Vann Owens) 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 39 (1992).

Attorney General Opinions. General authority of judges of general sessions to administer oaths is not limited by T.C.A. §§ 8-18-107, 8-18-109(b) or 17-1-105, OAG 03-043, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (4/15/03).

Sheriff's disregard of chancery court order. OAG 10-120, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 126 (12/30/10).

16-1-103. Contempt.

For the effectual exercise of its powers, every court is vested with the power to punish for contempt, as provided for in this code.

Code 1858, § 4100; Shan., § 5912; Code 1932, § 10111; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-103.

Cross-References. Punishment for contempt, title 29, ch. 9.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.14.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city court to punish an individual for contempt of court when the person fails to appear in court for an appointed court date. OAG 11-17, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/15/11).

A court has authority to enter a default judgment of contempt in a proceeding for civil contempt if the alleged contemnor fails to respond or appear, as long as the alleged contemnor has been provided with proper notice and the opportunity to respond. OAG 15-36, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (4/21/15).

16-1-104. Conflicts in use of courtroom.

In case of conflict among the courts, the use of the courtroom may be regulated by consent, in which case the court yielding the room may hold its session in any other room within the limits of the county seat. If no agreement is made, the circuit court shall be preferred to the chancery court. If excluded from the courtroom on Monday, the circuit court shall try no jury causes on that day, except by consent of parties.

Code 1858, § 4097 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 12); Shan., § 5909; Code 1932, § 10109; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.16.

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of court space by presiding judge, OAG 99-049, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (3/2/99).

16-1-105. Holding court outside of courthouse or in courthouse or room outside county seat.

If for any cause, in the opinion of the court deemed sufficient, it is impracticable or inconvenient for any court to hold its session at the courthouse, or place designated by law, it shall be lawful for the court to hold its session, or any part of its session, at any other room within the limits of the county seat, or at any other room open to the public within an institution of the department of correction or the department of children's services if the court deems it necessary, and all its proceedings at such place, whether in civil or criminal cases, are as valid as if done at the courthouse.

It is lawful for the court to temporarily hold its session, or any part of its session, in a courthouse or other room located outside the county seat if:

The courthouse in the county seat is rendered temporarily unusable by reason of a natural disaster;

Trials and other judicial proceedings are scheduled to be held in the courthouse during the time the courthouse is temporarily unusable;

Another room located within the county seat with sufficient security and otherwise suitable for conducting court proceedings is not available; and

The presiding judge of the district determines that extraordinary circumstances exist such that temporarily moving the judicial proceedings outside the county seat is in the best interests of justice.

If the presiding judge of the judicial district determines the requirements of subdivision (a)(2)(A) have been met, the presiding judge will consult with the person who schedules events and proceedings at the location outside the county seat to determine dates when the courthouse or room outside the county seat is available for use.

When the courthouse, or place designated by law, within the county seat is ready for use, judicial proceedings must be returned to the courthouse of the county seat, unless a trial is in progress at the time the courthouse within the county seat is ready for use and all parties involved agree to keep the matter in the courthouse or room outside the county seat until the conclusion of the case.

All proceedings held pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) in a courthouse or other room located outside the county seat, whether civil or criminal cases, are as valid as if done at the courthouse within the county seat.

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(2) allows:

The direct or indirect relocation of the county seat; or

A court to lawfully hold its session at a courthouse or other room located outside the county seat for a period of time longer than is necessary to relocate or reconstruct a courthouse or other room within the limits of the county seat, except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(C).

As used in this subdivision (a)(2), “natural disaster” has the same meaning as defined in § 4-31-803.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing or prohibiting a county that has constructed a criminal justice building or facility, or that uses a building or facility, that is not located within the limits of the county seat, from holding criminal court in that building or facility; provided, that it is located within the limits of the county. If the building or facility is used to hold criminal court, a defendant may be indicted, prosecuted, tried and convicted in that building or facility as if done at the courthouse.

Code 1858, § 4096 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 7; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 13); Shan., § 5908; Code 1932, § 10108; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-105; Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 12, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 28; 1996, ch. 1079, § 30; 2006, ch. 630, § 2; 2020, ch. 805, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.16.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of court space by presiding judge, OAG 99-049, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (3/2/99).

Unless expressly authorized by T.C.A. §§ 16-2-106 through 16-2-402 or a private act, neither a general sessions nor a circuit court may regularly hold its sessions outside the city limits of the county seat, OAG 05-122 (8/8/05).

16-1-106. Minutes.

The minutes of the court for each day's work shall be signed by the judge. The minute book shall provide a place for the judge's signature after the minute entries each day; however, where the orders of the court are photocopied so that an accurate facsimile of the entire order and judge's signature appears, it shall be sufficient for the judge to sign at the end of the minute book approving all the minutes in the book.

When any judge or chancellor fails to sign the minutes of the judge's or chancellor's court because of death, vacancy in office or disability, or for any other reason, the judge's or chancellor's successor shall examine all the unsigned minutes, and if the successor finds that the unsigned minutes satisfactorily represent the true and complete proceedings of the court, the successor shall so certify. The judge's or chancellor's successor shall examine any decree or order that has been signed by the deceased or disabled predecessor but that has not been spread upon the minutes of the court, and if the successor finds that the decree or order is a true and complete decree or order, the successor shall direct that the decree or order be spread upon the minutes of the court and certify the minutes. Any minutes certified by a judge or chancellor pursuant to this subsection (b) have the same force and effect as minutes entered pursuant to subsection (a).

Code 1858, § 4101 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 49, § 20); Shan., § 5913; Code 1932, § 10112; Acts 1967, ch. 81, § 1; 1972, ch. 803, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-106; Acts 1984, ch. 756, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 25.

Law Reviews.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, IV. The Record on Appeal (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 35.

16-1-107. Power to sell land.

In all suits, instituted according to law, to sell the real estate of decedents for the payment of debts, or to sell lands for partition, a court of record may decree a sale of lands lying in any part of the state.

Code 1858, § 4102 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 170); Shan., § 5914; mod. Code 1932, § 10113; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-107.

Law Reviews.

Abolishing Local Action Rules: A First Step toward Modernizing Jurisdiction and Venue in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 251 (2004).

16-1-108. Vesting title by decree or clerk's deed.

Courts having jurisdiction to sell lands, instead of ordering parties to convey, may divest and vest title directly by decree, or empower the clerk to make title.

Code 1858, § 4103 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 48; 1837-1838, ch. 176, § 1); Shan., § 5915; Code 1932, § 10114; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-108.

Cross-References. Judgment for specific acts; vesting title, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 70.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 301, 303, 306.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, §§ 12, 38.

Law Reviews.

Quiet Title Actions in Tennessee, 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 263 (1985).

16-1-109. Registration of decree or clerk's deed.

The decree or deed of the clerk, as the case may be, has the same force and effect as a conveyance by the party, and shall be registered.

Code 1858, § 4104 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 48; 1837-1838, ch. 176); Shan., § 5916; Code 1932, § 10115; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-109.

Cross-References. Judgment for specific acts; vesting title, Tenn R. Civ. P. 70.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 303.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

16-1-110. Implied covenants in sales of land.

In cases where the sale is made at the voluntary instance of parties, the decree or deed of the clerk shall imply a covenant of seisin and warranty of title by the parties whose interest is sold, their heirs and representatives, unless otherwise provided in the face of the decree.

Code 1858, § 4105; Shan., § 5917; Code 1932, § 10116; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-110.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 303.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 12; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 22.

16-1-111. Use of papers filed in federal courts.

In all cases that have been removed from the courts of the state to the federal courts, and that have been afterward remanded to the state courts, the pleadings, depositions and proofs that have been filed in the federal court during its pendency there shall be used as if the pleadings, depositions and proofs had been originally filed in the state court. In cases where the original depositions, pleadings and proofs cannot be obtained from the federal court for use in the state court, then certified copies of the original depositions, pleadings and proofs may be obtained from the federal court, for use in the state court, instead of the originals.

Acts 1903, ch. 17, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 5917a1, 5917a2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10117, 10118; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 317.

16-1-112. Justice of the peace — Name change throughout code.

Tennessee Code Annotated is amended in each of its provisions providing the judicial powers, duties, functions or jurisdiction of the justice of the peace to delete references to “justice of the peace” or any variation of those words and to substitute instead references to the “court of general sessions” or “judge of the court of general sessions” or a variation of those words. The Tennessee code commission is granted the authority to reword the provisions to conform to the appropriate reference and sentence structure and to make grammatical changes necessary to effect those word changes without any change of substantive law.

Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A., § 19-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Courts of General Sessions, § 20; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 1, 2.

16-1-113. Court business and filings — Facsimile transmissions.

It is the intent of the general assembly, in recognition of the common practice and use of facsimile transmissions (faxes) in business and government, to:

Promote a more efficient means of filing documents and overcome expenses and delays entailed in long distance communication; and

Enable courts in this state to implement procedures for the filing of documents by fax.

Courts in this state may implement procedures for the transmission of documents by fax machines in accordance with this section and § 16-3-408 and the Tennessee supreme court rules.

Acts 1991, ch. 146, §§ 1, 2.

16-1-114. Immunity for judges sitting specially or by interchange.

Any judge or lawyer sitting specially under § 16-15-209 or § 17-2-208 or by interchange shall have the same immunity as the judge for whom the judge or lawyer is sitting, and the state or county that would provide the defense for the judge for whom the lawyer or judge is sitting shall be required to provide the defense for the substitute judge.

Acts 1997, ch. 473, § 1.

16-1-115. Electronic signatures.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, courts in this state may implement procedures for the use of electronic signatures in the signing of pleadings, court orders, judgment orders, affidavits of complaint, arrest warrants, a mittimus or other court documents. An electronic signature may be used to sign a document and shall have the same force and effect as a written signature.

Acts 1997, ch. 505, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The E-Sign Act: A Move in the Right Direction and a Boost for E-Commerce (Daniel W. Van Horn), 37 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. In allowing an officer to use an electronic signature, a detailed proposal for the issuance of an arrest warrant conformed with the statutory provision giving electronic signatures the same force and effect as written signatures in affidavits of complaint and arrest warrants; therefore, the resulting one-page arrest warrant with the electronic signature of the affiant and two original signatures of the judicial commissioner constituted a valid charging instrument, OAG 00-124, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 125 (8/7/00).

If an affiant personally appears before a judicial commissioner to swear to the allegations of the arrest warrant and signs the warrant using an electronic signature pad, the resulting arrest warrant bearing the electronic signature constitutes a valid charging instrument, OAG 00-124, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 125 (8/7/00).

16-1-116. Transfer of actions or appeals.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule of court to the contrary, when an original civil action, an appeal from the judgment of a court of general sessions, or a petition for review of a final decision in a contested case under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, is filed in a state or county court of record or a general sessions court and such court determines that it lacks jurisdiction, the court shall, if it is in the interest of justice, transfer the action or appeal to any other such court in which the action or appeal could have been brought at the time it was originally filed. Upon such a transfer, the action or appeal shall proceed as if it had been originally filed in the court to which it is transferred on the date upon which it was actually filed in the court from which it was transferred.

Acts 2000, ch. 794, § 1.

16-1-117. Reporting case statistics — Automated court information system.

It is the duty of the administrative office of the courts to collect, develop, and maintain uniform statistical information relative to court caseloads in Tennessee. To assist the administrative office of the courts in this duty, the clerks of each court shall report case data as set forth below:

Each criminal case shall be assigned a unique docket number. A criminal case shall be defined and reported as a single charge or set of charges arising out of a single incident concerning a single defendant in one (1) court proceeding. An incident shall be all criminal activity occurring on the same date. A court proceeding refers to a single level of court, such as general sessions or circuit. An appeal, probation revocation, or other post-judgment proceeding shall be considered a separate case. This definition shall not alter the practice in the Tennessee rules of criminal procedure dealing with joinder and severance of criminal cases. In addition, in courts of record, multiple incidents shall be counted as a single case when the charges are of a related nature and it is the district attorney general's intention that all of the charges be handled in the same court proceeding pursuant to a single indictment. If a case has more than one (1) charge or count, then the administrative office of the courts shall count the case according to the highest class of charge or count for the weighted caseload study based on the formula set out in § 16-2-513(a). Nothing in this subdivision (a)(1) shall operate to deprive court clerks of any fees to which they were entitled prior to July 1, 2014;

A civil case shall be defined as all motions, petitions, claims, counterclaims or proceedings between the parties resulting from the initial filing until the case is disposed. A unique docket number will be assigned to a civil case upon filing. Until the case is disposed, all subsequent motions, petitions, claims, counterclaims or proceedings between the parties resulting from the initial filing will be handled under the assigned docket number and will not be assigned a new docket number. Once a civil case has been disposed and further actions occur on the case, the original case will be reopened using the same docket number under which it was originally filed and is subject to additional court costs. All subsequent motions, petitions, claims, counterclaims or proceedings relating to the reopened case will be handled under the one reopened case docket number until disposed. Any subsequent re-openings will still use the original docket number, but will be counted by the administrative office of the courts as a new case for case-reporting purposes and are subject to additional court costs. Civil cases in courts of record shall be counted and reported to the administrative office of the courts according to this subdivision (a)(2);

All general sessions courts and municipal courts with general sessions jurisdiction shall collect and provide court data to the administrative office of the courts based on the definitions for criminal and civil cases as provided in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2);

All courts of record, except for juvenile courts, and all general sessions courts and municipal courts with general sessions jurisdiction shall report caseload data to the administrative office of the courts not less than one (1) time each month, so that all cases filed and disposed in one (1) month have been received by the administrative office of the courts by the fifteenth day of the following month in which the case is filed or disposed. The administrative office of the courts shall create forms to be used by each court in reporting the caseload data;

The administrative office of the courts will provide written notification to any responsible party found not to be in compliance with the reporting requirements. Written notification will detail the type of noncompliance and recommend the corrective action to be taken. If compliance is not achieved during the subsequent reporting period following notification, the administrative office of the courts will no longer accept data from the office not in compliance until such time as the errors are corrected. Notification of this action will be sent to all judges, district attorneys general, district public defenders and court clerks within the district where the noncomplying office is located. Notification will also be sent to the district attorneys general conference, the district public defenders conference, the administrative office of the courts and the county officials association of Tennessee. Any periods of noncompliance will also be reported in the annual report to the chairs of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives and the judiciary committee of the senate;

The clerks of those courts wherein commitments to a mental institution, as defined in § 16-10-213, are ordered or persons are adjudicated as a mental defective, as defined in § 16-10-213, shall report information described in § 16-10-213(c) regarding individuals who have been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution. Included in the report pursuant to this subdivision (a)(6)(A) shall be the date in which such information was also reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS index;

The clerks of courts, pursuant to the reporting requirements of §§ 16-10-213, 16-11-206, 16-15-303 and 16-16-120, shall provide sufficient information to the administrative office of the courts who shall make such reports on behalf of those clerks as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of receipt of signed order;

The information reported pursuant to subdivision (a)(6)(A) shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceedings pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354;

The administrative office of the courts shall provide written notification to any responsible party found not to be in compliance with the reporting requirements of this subdivision (a)(6) or with the reporting requirements of §§ 16-10-213, 16-11-206, 16-15-303 and 16-16-120. If compliance is not achieved during the subsequent reporting period following notification, the administrative office of the courts will no longer accept data from the office not in compliance. Notification of this action will be sent to all judges, district attorneys general, district public defenders and court clerks within the district where the noncomplying office is located. Notification will also be sent to the district attorneys general conference, the district public defenders conference, the administrative office of the courts and the county officials association of Tennessee. Any periods of noncompliance will also be reported in the annual report to the chair of the judiciary committee of the senate and the chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives.

Any automated court information system being used or developed on or after July 1, 2003, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee court information system (TnCIS) being designed pursuant to § 16-3-803(h), shall ensure comparable data will be reported to the administrative office of the courts with respect to courts of record, and criminal cases in general sessions courts and municipal courts with general sessions jurisdiction, using the definitions and standards set forth in subsection (a). Each system shall use the Tennessee code citation on each criminal charge, and have the capability of using this information to classify the type and class of each charge.

Acts 2001, ch. 408, § 4; 2002, ch. 791, §§ 2-4, 6; 2013, ch. 236, § 37; 2013, ch. 300, § 1; 2014, ch. 673, § 1; 2018, ch. 799, § 6; 2019, ch. 345, § 19; 2019, ch. 420, § 6.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 11, § II of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

16-1-118. Utilization of electronic court filing system provider authorized by the administrative office of the courts.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all courts in this state that implement an electronic court filing system pursuant to Tennessee Supreme Court Rule 46 and Tennessee Rule of Civil Procedure 5B shall utilize only a system provider authorized by the administrative office of the courts. The administrative office of the courts shall establish technical standards with the goals of ensuring integrity of filings, assuring an environment that promotes uniformity and ease of filing, and providing the framework for future compatibility among e-filing solutions implemented by local and state courts. Nothing in this section shall require the administrative office of the courts to begin implementing a statewide e-filing system.

Acts 2013, ch. 279, § 1.

16-1-119. Advisory task force to review composition of judicial districts.

By no later than September 1, 2018, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall establish an advisory task force to review the composition of Tennessee's current judicial districts codified at § 16-2-506.

The task force shall be composed of eleven (11) members, as follows:

Three (3) current trial court judges, one (1) representing each grand division, appointed by joint action of the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives;

Three (3) current district attorneys general, one (1) representing each grand division, appointed by joint action of the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives;

Three (3) current district public defenders, one (1) representing each grand division, appointed by the joint action of the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives; and

Two (2) citizen members, one (1) appointed by each speaker. The citizen members must reside in different grand divisions.

The speakers shall jointly designate one (1) of the members to serve as chair of the task force.

By no later than December 1, 2019, the task force shall complete its findings and recommend and publish a proposed statewide judicial redistricting plan. The plan shall provide reasonable and timely access to Tennessee's circuit, chancery, and criminal courts and shall promote the efficient utilization of publicly funded resources allocated for the courts.

Prior to completing its findings and recommending this plan, the task force shall conduct at least one (1) public hearing within each of the three (3) grand divisions and shall receive oral and written testimony from interested organizations and citizens of this state. In addition, the task force shall establish a publicly accessible judicial redistricting task force page on the website of the administrative office of the courts for redistricting-related information, including meeting notices and redistricting plans.

The task force shall deliver a report of its findings, as well as its proposed judicial redistricting plan, to the governor, the speakers of the senate and house of representatives, the judiciary committee of the senate, the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, and the administrative office of the courts at least one (1) week prior to publication of the proposed judicial redistricting plan.

The administrative office of the courts shall provide support services to the task force created under this section.

The members of the task force shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement of any travel expenses incurred. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in conformity with the comprehensive state travel regulations as promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The task force shall cease to exist upon completion of the task force's report and recommendations.

Acts 2018, ch. 974, § 4; 2019, ch. 345, § 20.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

16-1-120. Processing passport applications — Photographs for passports.

If a court clerk chooses to process passport applications, the court clerk may take photographs for the passports and charge a reasonable fee for such service.

Acts 2019, ch. 344, § 1.